Rhode Island, session 2025, SB996.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.19
THE STATEWIDE IMPLEMENTATION ANALYSIS FOR A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
REDEMPTION, PACKAGING, AND RECYCLING PLAN
23-19.19-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Statewide Implementation Analysis
for a Beverage Container Redemption, Packaging, and Recycling Plan".
23-19.19-2. Statewide implementation analysis for a beverage container redemption,
packaging, and recycling plan.
(a) The department of environmental management (DEM), in collaboration with the
department of administration (DOA), and the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation
(RIRRC), shall commission a statewide needs assessment to determine the infrastructure, policy,
and programmatic requirements necessary to support a statewide redemption and recycling plan
including packaging materials, paper products, standard and miniature size beverage containers
including, but not limited to, aluminum and bimetal containers, glass containers, plastic containers,
and other priority materials as designated by the department.
(b) By October 29, 2025, the department shall procure an independent third-party

consultant with relevant expertise to conduct the assessment, which shall include:
(1) A baseline solid waste and recycling analysis, which shall include an analysis of the
following:
(i) A characterization of the statewide solid waste stream by material type, quantity, source,
and disposal method;
(ii) A breakdown of recyclable and compostable materials by jurisdiction, type, collection
method, and end-market destination;
(iii) An analysis of materials that are currently not captured but are recyclable; and
(iv) Current costs and revenues associated with municipal solid waste, recycling, and
composting operations, including tipping fees and contract terms.
(2) An infrastructure and capacity evaluation, which shall include an evaluation of the
following:
(i) An analysis and inventory of existing collection, sorting, and processing infrastructure,
including materials recovery facilities (MRFs), composting operations, and transfer stations;
(ii) An assessment of processing capacity gaps and identification of capital investments
required to expand local and regional processing;
(iii) A review of reuse and refill systems, including reverse logistics and retail-based
programs; and
(iv) An evaluation of current contamination and litter rates, material flow logistics, and
gaps in access to curbside and drop-off collection services.
(3) An assessment of environmental geographic considerations, which shall include an
assessment of the following:
(i) A demographic and geographic analysis of waste service access and participation;
(ii) An evaluation of public outreach, education, and participation in reuse and recycling
programs; and
(iii) Recommendations to enhance job quality, health and safety for facility and collection
workers.
(4) Economic and market impacts, which shall include the following:
(i) Identification of lost economic value due to landfilling of recyclable materials;
(ii) Job estimates and business opportunities related to increased material recovery,
recycling, and reuse;
(iii) Barriers and recommendations for developing local end-markets and supply chains
that utilize recovered and redeemed materials; and
(iv) A cost-benefit analysis of a redemption and comprehensive recycling program
LC002805/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

framework for all impacted parties.
(5) A redemption and recycling plan design review, which shall include the following:
(i) An evaluation of successful redemption and recycling program designs in peer states;
(ii) Recommendations for a Rhode Island redemption fee; and
(iii) An analysis of environmental benefits, including greenhouse gas reductions, material
recovery targets, and reduced litter and marine debris.
(iv) Consideration of recommendations provided in the final report of the special joint
legislative bottle waste commission to study and provide recommendations to protect our
environment and natural resources from plastic waste.
(v) Consideration of the program proposed in H6207/S0996 as introduced in the general
assembly January session AD. 2025.
(6) Suggested performance targets and phasing recommendations, which shall include the
following:
(i) Diversion goals, timetables, and metrics for assessing success under low, moderate, and
high-impact implementation scenarios;
(ii) Recommendations for investment timelines, education campaigns, and dashboard
designs, and reporting protocols to ensure transparency and accountability; and
(iii) Recommendations for addressing specific items in the waste stream including, but not
limited to, miniature size beverage containers.
(iv) An analysis of the performance targets and implementation timelines proposed in
H6207/S0996 as introduced in the general assembly January session AD. 2025.
(c) The implementation analysis pursuant to this section shall be conducted with input from
municipalities, quasi-public agencies, and regional planning entities and shall include direct input
from industry stakeholders and impacted communities.
23-19.19-3. Rhode Island redemption and recycling advisory council.
(a) DEM shall convene a Rhode Island redemption and recycling advisory council to
provide guidance, review preliminary findings, and make recommendations throughout the
assessment process.
(b) The advisory council shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) One representative from each of the five (5) counties of the State of Rhode Island,
including Bristol County, Kent County, Newport County, Providence County and Washington
County from the public works department or with waste management authority;
(2) One representative from a Rhode Island-based packaging or consumer goods producer;
(3) One representative from a materials recovery facility operating in Rhode Island;
LC002805/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

(4) One representative from a composting or organics processing facility;
(5) One representative from a Rhode Island reuse or refill systems operator; and
(6) One academic or scientific expert on waste systems, environmental health, or circular
economy.
23-19.19-4. Rhode Island redemption and recycling advisory report.
(a) The department shall, prior to the final report required by this section, hold at least one
public hearing to solicit input on the draft implementation analysis before its finalization.
(b) An interim status report shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house,
the senate president, and the chairs of the house and senate environment committees no later than
April 1, 2026.
(c) The final report, including findings and recommendations, shall be submitted to the
governor, the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the chairs of the house and senate
environment committees no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002805/SUB A
========
LC002805/SUB A - Page 4 of 5